North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 23. Oleomargarine. [Repealed]

§ 106-233.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 614, s. 42.

§ 106-234.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1949, c. 978, s. 2.

§ 106-235.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 1135.

§§ 106-236 through 106-238.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 614, s. 42.